Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-624
Benefits; weekly benefit amount; calculation.

For any benefit year beginning on or after January 1, 2018:

(1) An individual's weekly benefit amount shall be one-half of his or her average weekly wage rounded down to the nearest even whole dollar amount, but shall not exceed one-half of the state average weekly wage as annually determined under section 48-121.02;

(2) For purposes of this section, an individual's average weekly wage shall equal the wages paid for insured work in the highest quarter of the base period divided by thirteen; and

(3) Any change in the weekly benefit amounts prescribed in this section or in the maximum annual benefit amount prescribed in section 48-626 shall be applicable for the calendar year following the annual determination made pursuant to section 48-121.02.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 3, p. 375;

Laws 1939, c. 56, § 2, p. 233;

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 2, p. 381;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-703;

R.S.1943, § 48-624;

Laws 1945, c. 114, § 2, p. 371;

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 1, p. 423;

Laws 1951, c. 157, § 1, p. 630;

Laws 1953, c. 168, § 1, p. 541;

Laws 1955, c. 190, § 5, p. 542;

Laws 1957, c. 209, § 1, p. 738;

Laws 1959, c. 229, § 1, p. 802;

Laws 1963, c. 291, § 1, p. 870;

Laws 1965, c. 286, § 1, p. 819;

Laws 1967, c. 299, § 1, p. 814;

Laws 1969, c. 401, § 1, p. 1394;

Laws 1971, LB 651, § 4;

Laws 1972, LB 1391, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 333, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 775, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 475, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 337, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 183, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 524, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 216, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 446, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 315, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 286, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 225, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 739, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 25.